District of Columbia statutes.
2-1135

Funding of the Regional Authority.

(a)

The OCOG shall provide reasonable funds for the operation of the Regional Authority and the conduct of its business in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, payment of any insurance premiums incurred by the Regional Authority under the authority granted to it by § 2-1136 shall not be considered operations funds referred to in subsection (a) of this section. The OCOG shall pay only such insurance premiums as are reasonable.

(c)

The OCOG shall not be responsible for any financial liability that the Regional Authority may incur under § 2-1136.

(d)

The Regional Authority shall submit to the OCOG a planned budget for the Regional Authority’s next fiscal year, adopted consistent with § 2-1133, no less than 90 days before the beginning of the next fiscal year.

Feb. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-63, § 6, 48 DCR 10549